Utah statutes.
63G-17-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Agency" means:

(a)  the House of Representatives;

(b)  the Senate;

(c)  a staff office of the Legislature;

(d)  a department in the executive branch of state government;

(e)  the Judicial Council; or

(f)  a state institution of higher education.

(2)  "Air pollutant" is as defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7602(g).

(3)  "Designated county" means:

(a)  Salt Lake County;

(b)  Davis County;

(c)  Utah County;

(d)  Weber County;

(e)  Box Elder County;

(f)  Cache County;

(g)  Duchesne County; or

(h)  Uintah County.

(4)  "Mitigation efforts" means measures taken to reduce the emission of air pollutants, including:

(a)  flexible work schedules to reduce driving during peak times;

(b)  telecommuting;

(c)  electronic communication, including teleconferencing;

(d)  encouraging ride sharing;

(e)  encouraging use of public or alternative forms of transportation;

(f)  energy conservation;

(g)  using alternative energy sources;

(h)  recycling and using recycled products;

(i)  using non-aerosol products;

(j)  reducing idling;

(k)  low-maintenance landscaping; or

(l)  other technology that may be used, or measures that may be taken, to reduce the emission of air pollutants.



Enacted by Chapter 105, 2013 General Session

